District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2413.10

Additional charge on unpaid water bills.

Repealed.

History

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 101, ch. 218, title I, § 102
June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-136, § 2(a), 37 DCR 2620
repealed pursuant to § 303 of D.C. Law 11-111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1527.
1973 Ed., § 43-1521a.

Editor's Notes

Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 303 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.